Utah statutes.
72-10-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Acrobatics" means the intentional maneuvers of an aircraft not necessary
to air navigation.
(2)  "Aeronautics" means transportation by aircraft, air instruction, the
operation, repair, or maintenance of aircraft, and the design, operation,
repair, or maintenance of airports, or other air navigation facilities.
(3)  "Aeronautics instructor" means any individual engaged in giving or
offering to give instruction in aeronautics, flying, or ground subjects,
either with or without:
(a)  compensation or other reward;
(b)  advertising the occupation;
(c)  calling his facilities an air school, or any equivalent term; or
(d)  employing or using other instructors.
(4)  "Aircraft" means any contrivance now known or in the future invented,
used, or designed for navigation of or flight in the air.
(5)  "Air instruction" means the imparting of aeronautical information by any
aviation instructor or in any air school or flying club.
(6)  "Airport" means any area of land, water, or both, that:
(a)  is used or is made available for landing and takeoff;
(b)  provides facilities for the shelter, supply, and repair of aircraft, and
handling of passengers and cargo;
(c)  meets the minimum requirements established by the division as to size and
design, surface, marking, equipment, and operation; and
(d)  includes all areas shown as part of the airport in the current airport
layout plan as approved by the Federal Aviation Administration.
(7)  "Airport authority" means a political subdivision of the state, other
than a county or municipality, that is authorized by statute to operate an
airport.
(8)  "Airport operator" means a municipality, county, or airport authority
that owns or operates a commercial airport.
(9) (a)  "Airport revenue" means:
(i)  all fees, charges, rents, or other payments received by or accruing to an
airport operator for any of the following reasons:
(A)  revenue from air carriers, tenants, lessees, purchasers of airport
properties, airport permittees making use of airport property and services,
and other parties;
(B)  revenue received from the activities of others or the transfer of rights
to others relating to the airport, including revenue received:
(I)  for the right to conduct an activity on the airport or to use or occupy
airport property;
(II)  for the sale, transfer, or disposition of airport real or personal
property, or any interest in that property, including transfer through a
condemnation proceeding;
(III)  for the sale of, or the sale or lease of rights in, mineral, natural,
or agricultural products or water owned by the airport operator to be taken
from the airport; and
(IV)  for the right to conduct an activity on, or for the use or disposition
of, real or personal property or any interest in real or personal property
owned or controlled by the airport operator and used for an airport-related
purpose but not located on the airport; or
(C)  revenue received from activities conducted by the airport operator
whether on or off the airport, which is directly connected to the airport
operator's ownership or operation of the airport; and
(ii)  state and local taxes on aviation fuel.
(b)  "Airport revenue" does not include amounts received by an airport
operator as passenger facility fees pursuant to 49 U.S.C. Sec. 40117.
(10)  "Air school" means any person engaged in giving, offering to give, or
advertising, representing, or holding himself out as giving, with or without
compensation or other reward, instruction in aeronautics, flying, or ground
subjects, or in more than one of these subjects.
(11)  "Airworthiness" means conformity with requirements prescribed by the
Federal Aviation Administration regarding the structure or functioning of
aircraft, engine, parts, or accessories.
(12)  "Civil aircraft" means any aircraft other than a public aircraft.
(13)  "Commercial aircraft" means aircraft used for commercial purposes.
(14)  "Commercial airport" means a landing area, landing strip, or airport
that may be used for commercial operations.
(15)  "Commercial flight operator" means a person who conducts commercial
operations.
(16)  "Commercial operations" means:
(a)  any operations of an aircraft for compensation or hire or any services
performed incidental to the operation of any aircraft for which a fee is
charged or compensation is received, including the servicing, maintaining, and
repairing of aircraft, the rental or charter of aircraft, the operation of
flight or ground schools, the operation of aircraft for the application or
distribution of chemicals or other substances, and the operation of aircraft
for hunting and fishing; or
(b)  the brokering or selling of any of these services; but
(c)  does not include any operations of aircraft as common carriers
certificated by the federal government or the services incidental to those
operations.
(17)  "Dealer" means any person who is actively engaged in the business of
flying for demonstration purposes, or selling or exchanging aircraft, and who
has an established place of business.
(18)  "Division" means the Operations Division in the Department of
Transportation, created in Section 72-1-204.
(19)  "Experimental aircraft" means:
(a)  any aircraft designated by the Federal Aviation Administration or the
military as experimental and used solely for the purpose of experiments, or
tests regarding the structure or functioning of aircraft, engines, or their
accessories; and
(b)  any aircraft designated by the Federal Aviation Administration as:
(i)  being custom or amateur built; and
(ii)  used for recreational, educational, or display purposes.
(20)  "Flight" means any kind of locomotion by aircraft while in the air.
(21)  "Flying club" means five or more persons who for neither profit nor
reward own, lease, or use one or more aircraft for the purpose of instruction,
pleasure, or both.
(22)  "Glider" means an aircraft heavier than air, similar to an airplane, but
without a power plant.
(23)  "Mechanic" means a person who constructs, repairs, adjusts, inspects, or
overhauls aircraft, engines, or accessories.
(24)  "Parachute jumper" means any person who has passed the required test for
jumping with a parachute from an aircraft, and has passed an examination
showing that he possesses the required physical and mental qualifications for
the jumping.
(25)  "Parachute rigger" means any person who has passed the required test for
packing, repairing, and maintaining parachutes.
(26)  "Passenger aircraft" means aircraft used for transporting persons, in
addition to the pilot or crew, with or without their necessary personal
belongings.
(27)  "Person" means any individual, corporation, limited liability company,
or association of individuals.
(28)  "Pilot" means any person who operates the controls of an aircraft while
in-flight.
(29)  "Primary glider" means any glider that has a gliding angle of less than
10 to one.
(30)  "Public aircraft" means an aircraft used exclusively in the service of
any government or of any political subdivision, including the government of
the United States, of the District of Columbia, and of any state, territory,
or insular possession of the United States, but not including any government-
owned aircraft engaged in carrying persons or goods for commercial purposes.
(31)  "Reckless flying" means the operation or piloting of any aircraft
recklessly, or in a manner as to endanger the property, life, or body of any
person, due regard being given to the prevailing weather conditions, field
conditions, and to the territory being flown over.
(32)  "Registration number" means the number assigned by the Federal Aviation
Administration to any aircraft, whether or not the number includes a letter or
letters.
(33)  "Secondary glider" means any glider that has a gliding angle between 10
to one and 16 to one, inclusive.
(34)  "Soaring glider" means any glider that has a gliding angle of more than
16 to one.
